Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2460XC (4) 91 cm/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 147.140, subsection 1, paragraphs a and 1 b, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. In any action for personal injury or wrongful death 3 against a health care provider based upon the alleged 4 negligence in the practice of that profession or occupation or 5 in patient care, which includes a cause of action for which 6 expert testimony is necessary to establish a prima facie case, 7 the plaintiff shall, prior to the commencement of discovery in 8 the case and within sixty days of the defendantâs answer, serve 9 upon the defendant a notarized certificate of merit affidavit 10 affidavits signed by an each expert witness with respect to the 11 issue all issues of standard of care , and an alleged breach 12 of the standard of care , and causation to be litigated in the 13 action . The Each expert witness must meet the qualifying 14 standards of section 147.139 . 15 b. A All certificate of merit affidavit affidavits must be 16 notarized, signed by the each expert witness , and certify the 17 purpose purposes for calling the expert witness by providing 18 under the oath of the expert witness all of the following: 19 (1) The expert witnessâs statement of familiarity with the 20 applicable standard of care. 21 (2) The expert witnessâs statement that the standard of care 22 was breached by the health care provider named in the petition. 23 (3) The expert witnessâs statement that the breach caused 24 the personal injury or wrongful death. 25 Sec. 2. Section 147.140, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 26 to read as follows: 27 6. Failure to substantially comply with subsection 1 shall 28 result, upon motion, in dismissal with prejudice of each cause 29 of action as to which expert witness testimony is necessary to 30 establish a prima facie case. 31 Sec. 3. Section 147.140, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 32 following new subsection: 33 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. A motion challenging a certificate of 34 merit shall be made no later than sixty days from the date the 35 -1- LSB 2460XC (4) 91 cm/jh 1/ 3 S.F. _____ certificate of merit was filed. Once a motion to challenge a 1 certificate of merit is filed, a party shall not withdraw and 2 refile the certificate, except to provide missing expert or 3 notary signatures, nor shall a party voluntarily dismiss the 4 action and refile the certificate of merit. 5 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 6 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 7 Sec. 5. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to causes of action 8 that arise on or after the effective date of this Act. 9